en: Vegetable flans, Vegetable flan
fr: Flans de légumes, Flans aux légumes, Flan de légumes, Flan aux légumes

en: Almond spreads, almonds spreads
de: Mandel-Crèmes, Crème de Noisettes
es: Cremas a base de almendras
fi: Mantelilevitteet
fr: Pâtes à tartiner aux amandes
hr: Namazi od badema
it: Crema di mandorle
ja: アーモンドスプレッド
nl: Amandelpastas

en: Caramel spreads
de: Karamellaufstriche
es: Cremas de caramelo
fr: Pâtes à tartiner au caramel, Pâte à tartiner au caramel, Caramels à tartiner, Caramel à tartiner
hr: Karamel namazi
nl: Caramelpastas
pt: Caramelos para barrar

en: Chocolate spreads
bg: течен-шоколад
ca: Xocolata per untar
de: Nougatcremes, Nougatcreme, Nuß-Nougat-Cremes, Nuß-Nougat-Creme, Nussnougatcremes, Nussnougatcreme, Nussnougat-Cremes, Nussnougat-Creme
es: Cremas de chocolate, Cremas de cacao
fi: suklaalevitteet
fr: Pâtes à tartiner au chocolat, pâtes à tartiner au cacao
he: ממרחי שוקולד
hr: Čokoladni namazi
hu: Kenhető csokoládé
it: Crema con cacao
ja: チョコスプレッド
nl: Chocopastas, Chocoladepastas
pt: Creme para barrar de chocolate
ru: Шоколадные пасты
tr: Ekmeğe sürülen çikolata, Sürülebilir çikolata

en: Hazelnut spreads, hazelnuts spread
ca: Crema d'avellanes
de: Haselnusscremes
es: Cremas a base de avellanas
fi: hasselpähkinälevitteet
fr: Pâtes à tartiner aux noisettes, pâte à tartiner aux noisettes
hr: Namazi od lješnjaka
hu: Kenhető mogyoró
it: Crema con nocciole, crema alle nocciole
ja: ヘーゼルナッツスプレッド
nl: Hazelnootpastas
pl: Smarowidła z orzechów laskowych
pt: Creme para barrar de avelã
ru: Пасты из лесного ореха

en: Cocoa and hazelnuts spreads, Chocolate and hazelnuts spreads, Chocolate hazelnut spreads
de: Schoko- und Haselnussaufstriche
es: Cremas de cacao y avellanas
fi: suklaa- ja hasselpähkinälevitteet
fr: Pâtes à tartiner aux noisettes et au cacao, pâtes à tartiner aux noisettes et au chocolat, Pâtes à tartiner au cacao et aux noisettes, Pâtes à tartiner au chocolat et aux noisettes
hr: Namazi od kakaa i lješnjaka
hu: Kenhető csokoládé és mogyoró
it: Crema con nocciole e cacao
ja: ヘーゼルナッツチョコレートスプレッド
nl: Choco-hazelnootpastas, Chocoladehazelnootpastas
pt: Creme para barrar de avelã e cacau

en: Carob spreads
es: Cremas de algarroba
fr: Pâtes à tartiner au caroube
hr: Namazi od rogača
nl: Carobepastas, Johannesbroodboomvruchtenpastas

en: Speculoos spreads
de: Spekulatius Brotaufstrich, Spekulatiuscreme
fr: Pâtes à tartiner au spéculoos
hr: Speculoos širi
nl: Speculoospasta

en: Salted spreads, salty spreads, savoury spreads
bg: Солен крем за мазане
ca: Productes salats per untar
de: Gesalzene Aufstriche, salzige Aufstriche
es: Untables salados
fi: suolaiset levitteet
fr: Produits à tartiner salés
he: ממרחים מלוחים
hr: Slani namazi
hu: Sózott kenhető élelmiszerek, Sós kenhető élelmiszerek
it: Creme spalmabili salate
nl: Hartige smeerbare producten
pl: Słone smarowidła, słone pasty do smarowania
pt: Produtos salgados para barrar
zh: 咸味涂抹酱

en: Egg salads, Egg spreads
de: Eisalaten, Eisalat, Eiaufstriche, Eiersalat
fr: Salades d'œufs, salades d'oeufs, Tartinades d'œufs, tartinades d'oeufs, tartinades aux oeufs
lt: Salotos su kiaušiniais
nl: Eisalades, Eiersalades
pl: Sałatki jajeczne

en: Yeast extract spreads
es: Extractos de levadura untables
fr: Pâtes à tartiner à base de levures
hr: Namazi s ekstraktom kvasca
nl: Gistgebaseerde smeerpastas

en: Artichoke spreads
bg: Паста от артишок
fr: Crèmes d'artichaut
hr: Namazi od artičoke

en: Tapenades
xx: Tapenade
bg: Маслинова паста, Тапенада
bn: ট্যাপেনড
ca: Tapenada
cs: Tapenáda
cy: Tapenâd
da: Tapenader
eo: Tapenadoj
fr: Tapenades
he: ממרח זיתים
hi: तापानेड
hy: Տապենադա
ja: タプナード
ka: Ტაპენადა
ko: 타프나드
mk: Тапенада
ml: ടാപ്പനഡ്
nb: Tapenader
nl: Tapenades
nn: Tapenadar
oc: Tapenada
pl: Tapenada
ru: Тапенада
sv: Tapenader
uk: Тапенада
zh: 橄榄酱, 橄欖醬

en: Black tapenades
bg: Черна маслинова паста
fr: Tapenades noires, Tapenade noire, Tapenade aux olives noires
hr: Crne tapenade
nl: Zwarte tapenades

en: Green tapenades
bg: Зелена маслинова паста
fr: Tapenades vertes, Tapenade verte, Tapenade aux olives vertes
hr: Zelene tapenade
nl: Groene tapenades

fr: Condiments à tartiner, Condiment à tartiner
nl: Smeerbare kruiderijen

en: Oilseed purees
ca: Purés de llavors oleaginoses
de: Ölsaaten-Pürees
es: Purés de oleaginosas
fi: Öljykasvien soseet
fr: Purées d'oléagineux
hr: Pirei od uljarica
hu: Olajmagpürék
it: Puree di oli di semi
nl: Puree van oliehoudende zaden
pt: Purés de óleo de sementes
zh: 油籽泥

en: Pumpkin seed butters
es: Mantecas de semilla de calabaza
fr: Purées de graines de potiron
hr: Maslaci od sjemenki bundeve
nl: Pompoenzaadpuree
pt: Manteigas de sementes de abóbora

en: Sunflower seed butters
es: Mantecas de semilla de girasol
fr: Purées de graines de tournesol
hr: Maslaci od sjemenki suncokreta
nl: Zonnebloemzaadpuree
pt: Manteigas de sementes de girassol

en: Sweet bean paste
fr: Pâte de haricots, Pâte de haricots sucrée